Hawaii, session 2025, GM1410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
''§321- Alcohol and drug abuse division; homeless triage
and treatment center program; establishment. (a) The
department shall establish a homeless triage and treatment
center program within the alcohol and drug abuse division that
focuses on serving homeless individuals and individuals at risk
of homelessness with substance abuse issues or mental illness.
(b) The homeless triage and treatment center program
shall:
(1) Provide access to emergency food, shelter, housing
navigation, and supportive services;
(2) Collaborate with existing homeless outreach and case
management services;
(3) Provide medical assessments;
2025-3459 HB943 CDl HMSO 1
■iiiiiHiiiiiiim

Page 2 H.B. NO. SS.1
C.D. 1
(4) Provide substance abuse treatment and detoxification
services;
(5) Provide behavioral health services; and
(6) Provide trauma-informed, cultural-based life skills
groups for participants to maximize engagement and
retention.
(c) The alcohol and drug abuse division shall work in
cooperation with local hospitals, rehabilitation facilities, law
enforcement agencies, and homeless service providers in
establishing the homeless triage and treatment center program­
ed) The alcohol and drug abuse division may contract with
facilities that provide comprehensive triage services to
homeless individuals suffering from substance abuse issues or
mental illness to carry out the homeless triage and treatment
center program."
SECTION 2. Section 334-171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows;
"(a) There shall be established within the department a
crisis intervention and diversion services program to redirect
persons, including homeless persons, experiencing mental health
disorders and co-occurring mental health and substance use
2025-3459 HB943 CDl HMSO
inniiiaiiiiiniiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
disorders who are at risk for involvement, or currently
involved, with the criminal justice system to the appropriate
health care system and services. The program may include
intensive mobile outreach services. The department shall
collaborate with law enforcement agencies, courts, mental health
providers, and the community for the execution and
implementation of these services. Any appropriation for the
crisis intervention and diversion services program shall be used
only for services contracted directly between the department and
the service provider."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 to implement this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3459 HB943 CDl HMSO

943
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 7th day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 943, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 943, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAIH
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
186